Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2201.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. (a) On and after January 1, 2026, any owner or
lessee of one or more passenger vehicles or trucks registered for a gross
weight of 20,000 pounds or less who is a resident of Kansas, upon
compliance with the provisions of this section, may be issued one FFA
license plate for each such passenger vehicle or truck. Such license
plate shall be issued for the same time as other license plates upon
proper registration and payment of the regular license fee as provided
in K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto, and the payment to the
county treasurer of the logo use royalty payment.
(b) The Kansas FFA foundation may authorize the use of the
organization's logo to be affixed on license plates as provided by this
section. Any motor vehicle owner or lessee shall pay an amount of not
less than $25 nor more than $100, as determined by the Kansas FFA
foundation, as a logo use royalty payment for each such license plate to
be issued. The logo use royalty payment shall be paid to the county
treasurer.
(c) Any applicant for a license plate authorized by this section
may make application for such license plate not less than 60 days prior
to such person's renewal of registration date, on a form prescribed and
furnished by the director of vehicles, and any applicant for such license
plate shall pay to the county treasurer the logo use royalty payment.
Application for registration of a passenger vehicle or truck and issuance
of the license plate under this section shall be made by the owner or
lessee in a manner prescribed by the director of vehicles upon forms
furnished by the director.
(d) No registration or license plate issued under this section shall
be transferable to any other person.
(e) The director of vehicles may transfer a FFA license plate from
a leased vehicle to a purchased vehicle.
(f) Renewals of registration under this section shall be made
annually, upon payment of the fee prescribed in K.S.A. 8-143, and
amendments thereto, and in the manner prescribed in K.S.A. 8-132(b),
and amendments thereto. No renewal of registration shall be made to
any applicant until such applicant provides to the county treasurer the
annual royalty payment. If such annual royalty payment is not made to
the county treasurer, the applicant shall be required to comply with the
provisions of K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto, and return the
license plate to the county treasurer of such person's residence.
(g) The Kansas FFA foundation, with the approval of the director
of vehicles, shall design a plate to be issued under the provisions of this
section.
(h) As a condition of receiving the FFA license plate and any
subsequent registration renewal of such license plate, the applicant
shall consent to the division authorizing the division's release of motor
vehicle record information, including the applicant's name, address,
royalty payment amount, plate number and vehicle type to the Kansas
FFA foundation and the state treasurer.
(i) The collection and remittance of annual royalty payments by
the county treasurer shall be subject to the provisions of K.S.A. 8-
1,141(h), and amendments thereto.
New Sec. 2. (a) On and after January 1, 2026, any owner or lessee

HOUSE BILL No. 2201—page 2
of one or more passenger vehicles or trucks registered for a gross
weight of 20,000 pounds or less who is a resident of Kansas, upon
compliance with the provisions of this section, may be issued one route
66 association of Kansas license plate for each such passenger vehicle
or truck. Such license plate shall be issued for the same time as other
license plates upon proper registration and payment of the regular
license fee as provided in K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto, and
the payment to the county treasurer of the logo use royalty payment.
(b) Route 66 association of Kansas, inc., may authorize the use of
the organization's logo to be affixed on license plates as provided by
this section. Any motor vehicle owner or lessee shall pay an amount of
not less than $25 nor more than $100, as determined by route 66
association of Kansas, inc., as a logo use royalty payment for each such
license plate to be issued. The logo use royalty payment shall be paid to
the county treasurer.
(c) Any applicant for a license plate authorized by this section
may make application for such license plate not less than 60 days prior
to such person's renewal of registration date, on a form prescribed and
furnished by the director of vehicles, and any applicant for such license
plate shall pay to the county treasurer the logo use royalty payment.
Application for registration of a passenger vehicle or truck and issuance
of the license plate under this section shall be made by the owner or
lessee in a manner prescribed by the director of vehicles upon forms
furnished by the director.
(d) No registration or license plate issued under this section shall
be transferable to any other person.
(e) The director of vehicles may transfer a route 66 association of
Kansas license plate from a leased vehicle to a purchased vehicle.
(f) Renewals of registration under this section shall be made
annually, upon payment of the fee prescribed in K.S.A. 8-143, and
amendments thereto, and in the manner prescribed in K.S.A. 8-132(b),
and amendments thereto. No renewal of registration shall be made to
any applicant until such applicant provides to the county treasurer the
annual royalty payment. If such annual royalty payment is not made to
the county treasurer, the applicant shall be required to comply with the
provisions of K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto, and return the
license plate to the county treasurer of such person's residence.
(g) Route 66 association of Kansas, inc., with the approval of the
director of vehicles, shall design a plate to be issued under the
provisions of this section.
(h) As a condition of receiving the route 66 association of Kansas
license plate and any subsequent registration renewal of such license
plate, the applicant shall consent to the division authorizing the
division's release of motor vehicle record information, including the
applicant's name, address, royalty payment amount, plate number and
vehicle type to Route 66 association of Kansas, inc., and the state
treasurer.
(i) The collection and remittance of annual royalty payments by
the county treasurer shall be subject to the provisions of K.S.A. 8-
1,141(h), and amendments thereto.
New Sec. 3. (a) On and after January 1, 2026, any owner or lessee
of one or more passenger vehicles or trucks registered for a gross
weight of 20,000 pounds or less, who is a resident of Kansas, upon
compliance with the provisions of this section, may be issued one
blackout license plate for each such passenger vehicle or truck. Such
license plate shall be issued for the same period of time as other license
plates upon proper registration and payment of the regular license fee
as provided in K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto.
(b) Any applicant or renewal of registration for a blackout license
plate authorized by this section shall pay an annual fee of $50 to the
county treasurer for each such license plate to be issued. Any new
blackout license plate shall be subject to the fee prescribed in K.S.A 8-
1,141(a)(1), and amendments thereto. A blackout license plate may be a
personalized license plate and subject to the personalized license plate

HOUSE BILL No. 2201—page 3
fee pursuant to K.S.A. 8-1,141(a)(2), and amendments thereto.
(c) Any applicant for a license plate authorized by this section
may make application for such license plate on a form prescribed and
furnished by the director of vehicles. Application for registration of a
passenger vehicle or truck and issuance of the license plate under this
section shall be made by the owner or lessee in a manner prescribed by
the director of vehicles upon forms furnished by the director.
(d) No registration or license plate issued under this section shall
be transferable to any other person.
(e) The director of vehicles may transfer a blackout license plate
from a leased vehicle to a purchased vehicle.
(f) Renewals of registration under this section shall be made
annually, upon payment of the fee prescribed in K.S.A. 8-143, and
amendments thereto, and in the manner prescribed in K.S.A. 8-132(b),
and amendments thereto. No renewal of registration shall be made to
any applicant until such applicant has paid the fee provided in
subsection (b). If such fee is not paid, such applicant shall be required
to comply with K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto, and return the
license plate to the county treasurer of such applicant's residence.
(g) The blackout license plate shall have a background design, an
emblem or colors that designate the license plate as a blackout license
plate.
(h) There is hereby established in the state treasury the license
plate replacement fund. The license plate replacement fund shall be
administered by the secretary of revenue. Annual blackout license plate
fees collected by county treasurers pursuant to this section shall be
remitted to the state treasurer in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto. Upon receipt of each such
remittance, the state treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in the
state treasury to the credit of the license plate replacement fund. All
expenditures from such fund shall be for the costs associated with
replacing license plates when the lifespan of such license plates has
been exhausted as determined by the director of vehicles. All
expenditures from such fund shall be made in accordance with
appropriation acts upon warrants of the director of accounts and reports
issued pursuant to vouchers approved by the secretary of revenue or the
secretary's designee.
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 8-132 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-132.
(a) Subject to the provisions of this section and K.S.A. 8-1,125, and
amendments thereto, the division of vehicles shall furnish to every
owner whose vehicle shall be registered one license plate for such
vehicle. Such license plate shall have displayed on it the registration
number assigned to the vehicle and to the owner thereof, the name of
the state, which may be abbreviated, and the year or years for which it
is issued. The same type of license plates shall be issued for passenger
motor vehicles, rented without a driver, as are issued for private
passenger vehicles.
(b) During calendar year 1975 commencing on the effective date
of this act, and during every fifth calendar year thereafter, the division
of vehicles shall furnish one license plate for any type of vehicle an
owner registers or has the registration thereof renewed, but during the
succeeding four-year period following calendar year 1975 and during
the succeeding four-year period following every fifth calendar year
subsequent to 1975, the division of vehicles shall not furnish any
license plate for the renewal of a vehicle's registration. During calendar
year 1976 and during each calendar year thereafter in which a license
plate is not issued for the renewal of registration of a vehicle, the
division of vehicles shall furnish one decal for the license plate issued
for a vehicle as provided in K.S.A. 8-134, and amendments thereto, for
each registration and renewal of registration of such vehicle.
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection, whenever,
in the discretion of the director of vehicles, it is determined that the
license plates currently being issued and displayed are not deteriorating
to the extent that their replacement is warranted, the director may adopt

HOUSE BILL No. 2201—page 4
rules and regulations to extend the five-year issuance cycle provided
for in this subsection by one year at a time, and in the same manner the
director may further extend such cycle by one year at a time,
successively as the director determines appropriate. If the cycle is
extended at the expiration of the extended term, new license plates shall
again be issued in the manner and for the term provided in such rules
and regulations, except that the owner of a motor vehicle currently
registered may continue to display the license plate currently being
issued and displayed for a period not to exceed three registration years
from the date of the expiration of the extended term. The division shall
furnish one decal for each such license plate in accordance with the
provisions of this subsection.
(c) Any license plate issued pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) may
be a personalized license plate subject to the additional fee set forth in
subsection (d). The division shall allow an applicant for a personalized
license plate to personalize a license plate design established by
subsection (a), (b) or (d).
(d) TwoOne personalized license plates plate may be issued to any
owner or lessee of a passenger vehicle or a truck licensed for a gross
weight of not more than 20,000 pounds, who makes proper application
to the division of vehicles not less than 60 days prior to such owner's or
lessee's at renewal of registration date. Such application shall be on a
form prescribed by the division and accompanied by a fee of $40,
which shall be in addition to any other fee required to renew the
registration of such passenger vehicle under the laws of this state. One
Such personalized license plate shall be displayed on the rear of the
vehicle and, at the option of the owner or lessee, the other license plate
may be displayed on the front of the vehicle, except that no registration
decal shall be issued pursuant to K.S.A. 8-134, and amendments
thereto, for any such license plate displayed on the front of such
vehicle. One personalized license plate may be issued to any owner of a
motorcycle upon proper application in the same manner provided in
this subsection for passenger vehicles and trucks. The $40 fee shall be
paid only once during the registration period for which such license
plates were issued, and any subsequent renewals during the registration
period shall be subject only to the registration fee prescribed by K.S.A.
8-143, and amendments thereto. The division shall design distinctive,
personalized license plates to be issued which that shall contain not
more than seven letters or numbers on truck or passenger vehicle
license plates and not more than five letters or numbers on motorcycle
license plates, or a combination thereof, to be designated by the
applicant in lieu of the letters and numbers required by K.S.A. 8-147,
and amendments thereto, other than the letters required to designate the
county in which such vehicle is registered. Unless the letters or
numbers designated by the applicant have been assigned to another
vehicle, or unless the letters or numbers designated by the applicant
have a profane, vulgar, lewd or indecent meaning or connotation, as
determined by the director of vehicles, the division shall assign such
letters or numbers to the applicant's vehicle, and the letters or numbers,
or combination thereof, so assigned shall be deemed the registration
number of such vehicle. Subject to the foregoing provisions, all license
plates issued under this section shall be manufactured in accordance
with K.S.A. 8-147, and amendments thereto. Such license plates shall
be issued for a registration period of five years commencing in 1985
and each five years thereafter.
(e) The secretary of revenue shall adopt rules and regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of this act, including, without
limitation, rules and regulations concerning: (1) The procedure for
insuring that duplicate license plates are not issued throughout the state;
(2) the procedure for reserving distinctive license plates for the purpose
of obtaining the same on each annual renewal of registration; (3) the
procedure for allowing the transfer of personalized license plates from
one vehicle to another for which such license plates were originally
issued, when the title to the original vehicle has not been transferred

HOUSE BILL No. 2201—page 5
and the name or names of the owner or owners listed on the titles to
both vehicles are identical; and (4) procedures necessary to coordinate
this act with other laws of this state governing registration of vehicles.
The director of vehicles shall remit all moneys received by the division
of vehicles under this section to the state treasurer in accordance with
the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto. Upon
receipt of each such remittance, the state treasurer shall deposit the
entire amount in the state treasury to the credit of the state highway
fund.
Sec. 5. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 8-134 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 8-134. (a) Every vehicle registration under this act shall expire
December 31 of each year, except passenger vehicles and vehicles
provided for in K.S.A. 8-134a, and amendments thereto. The
registration of vehicles to which K.S.A. 8-134a, and amendments
thereto, applies shall expire in 1982 and thereafter in accordance with
the provisions of subsections (b) and (c). Registration of vehicles shall
be renewed annually upon application by the owner and by payment of
the fees required by law. Except vehicles subject to K.S.A. 8-134a, and
amendments thereto, and passenger vehicles, the renewal shall take
effect on January 1 of each year, but the owner of the vehicle shall have
until and including the last day of February of each year to make
application for such renewal. The division shall issue for such vehicles
a February month decal to correspond with the statutory grace period.
Criminal sanctions provided in K.S.A. 8-142, and amendments thereto,
for failure to display any license plate or plates or any registration decal
required to be affixed to any such license plate for the current
registration year shall not be enforced until March 1 of each year. An
owner who has made proper application for renewal of registration of a
vehicle prior to January 1, but who has not received the license plate or
registration card for the ensuing year, shall be entitled to operate or
permit the operation of such vehicle upon the highways upon
displaying thereon the license plate issued for the preceding year for
such time as the director of vehicles finds necessary for issuance of
such new license plate.
(b) Every passenger vehicle required by this act to be registered,
except as otherwise provided, shall be registered for a period of 12
consecutive months. The division of vehicles, in order to initiate a
system of registering or reregistering passenger vehicles during any
month of a calendar year, may register or reregister a passenger vehicle
for less than a 12-month period, prorating the annual registration fee,
when in the director's opinion such proration tends to fulfill the purpose
of the monthly registration system.
(c) Passenger vehicle registration, and the authority to legally
operate, use or tow such vehicle on the highway shall expire at 12
midnight on the last day of the last month of the 12-month period for
which such vehicle was registered, and the owner shall see that such
vehicle is reregistered as required by this act. The director of vehicles
shall designate the registration period for each passenger vehicle in
order to as nearly as feasible equalize registration or reregistration
within the 12 months of the year. Any vehicle after having once been
registered shall upon reregistration, be registered for the same twelve-
month period except when the certificate of title has been transferred as
provided by law. In this case, the vehicle shall be registered by the
division of vehicles in accordance with the system adopted.
(d) For the purpose of this act, hearses and electrically propelled
vehicles shall be classified as passenger vehicles.
(e) Every owner who registers or reregisters a vehicle in a
calendar year, and in any calendar year in which a license plate is not
issued for the renewal of registration of such vehicle, shall be furnished
by the division one decal for the license plate issued for such vehicle
and required by K.S.A. 8-133, and amendments thereto, to be affixed to
the rear of such vehicle. Such decal shall be affixed to the number plate
affixed to the rear of such vehicle and shall contain the letters
designating the county in which such vehicle is registered, as provided

HOUSE BILL No. 2201—page 6
in K.S.A. 8-147, and amendments thereto, shall indicate the license
plate number for which the decal is to be affixed and shall indicate the
year in which such registration expires. The color of a decal shall be
such that it contrasts with the color of the license plate to which it is to
be affixed, and the director of vehicles shall change the color of such
decals each year, without duplicating the same color in any five-year
period or such extended period as the director designates under K.S.A.
8-132(b), and amendments thereto. Such decals shall be so constructed
that once a decal has been affixed to a license plate, it cannot be
removed without destroying the decal, and the surface of such decals
shall be capable of reflecting light. Consistent with the foregoing, the
director of vehicles shall prescribe the size of and material to be used in
the production of such decals, and the director of vehicles shall
designate the location on a number plate where such decal shall be
affixed.
(f) (1) The owner of a vehicle may, at the time of such registration
or reregistration, purchase a park and recreation motor vehicle permit.
Such permit shall cost $15 until such time as the amount for such
permit is changed by rules and regulations of the secretary of wildlife
and parks.
(2) Such permit shall be nontransferable and shall expire on the
date of expiration of the vehicle registration.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (f)(4), the county treasurer
shall remit all such moneys paid to the county treasurer to the state
treasurer in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto. Upon receipt of each such remittance, the state
treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in the state treasury and shall
be credited as provided in K.S.A. 32-991, and amendments thereto.
(4) The county treasurer may collect and retain a service charge
fee of up to $.50 for each park and recreation motor vehicle permit
issued or sold by the county treasurer.
(5) As a condition of receiving the park and recreation motor
vehicle permit, the applicant shall consent to the sharing of
information, including, but not limited to, the applicant's name, address,
email address and phone number, with the secretary of wildlife and
parks by the division of motor vehicles.
(g) The secretary of revenue shall adopt rules and regulations
necessary to accomplish the purpose of this act.
Sec. 6. K.S.A. 8-147 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-147.
(a) As used in this section, "license plate" means the plate used to
externally evidence registration of a vehicle under chapter 8 of Kansas
Statutes Annotated.
(b) Prior to November 1 of each year, the director of vehicles shall
furnish the secretary of revenue with complete and detailed
specifications for the manufacture of all license plates and registration
decals, together with the number required for delivery in the succeeding
year for use during the following year, and. The state corporation
commission shall furnish the secretary of revenue with complete and
detailed specifications for the manufacture of identification tags
together with the number required for delivery in the succeeding year
for use in the following year. The secretary of revenue shall cause to be
manufactured all license plates and registration decals and state
corporation commission identification tags based on such specifications
and estimates. For such purpose, the secretary of revenue shall enter
into a contract for the manufacture of license plates, tags and decals
with any organization or institution designated in K.S.A. 39-1208, and
amendments thereto. Any such contract may provide that the secretary
of revenue shall furnish or cause to be furnished the materials and
supplies necessary for the manufacture and distribution of license
plates, tags and decals if, in the opinion of the secretary of revenue, a
reduction in the cost of manufacturing and distribution of the license
plates, tags and decals under such contract will be achieved. Subject to
the foregoing, the cost to the state for the manufacture of the license
plates, tags and decals pursuant to any contract entered into under this

HOUSE BILL No. 2201—page 7
section shall be substantially equivalent to such costs under prior
contracts, with the cost of license plates increased in the amount of the
cost of coating with reflective material, but any such contract shall not
be subject to the provisions of K.S.A. 75-3739, and amendments
thereto.
(c) Except as authorized by other provisions of law, license plates,
beginning in the year in which new license plates are issued pursuant to
K.S.A. 8-132, and amendments thereto, shall be lettered, numbered and
designed as provided in this section. Each license plate shall contain a
combination of three letters followed by a combination of three
numerals, except that once all allowable combinations of letters and
numerals have been used, each license plate shall contain an
arrangement of numerals or letters, or both, as shall be assigned by the
secretary of revenue. The arrangement of numerals and letters of
license plates shall be uniform throughout each classification of
registration. The secretary may provide for the arrangement of the
numerals and letters in groups or otherwise and for other distinguishing
marks on such license plates. The secretary of revenue shall design
decals to be affixed to the license plates to identify the county by two
letters chosen from the name of the county distinctly indicative of the
name of the county in which the vehicle is registered and the date
registration is to expire expiration information consistent with K.S.A. 8-
134, and amendments thereto. The letters and numerals of such license
plates shall be in such contrast of colors to the background of the
license plate as to make such letters and numerals easily read readable.
(d) As new license plates are issued, the face of every license plate
shall be completely coated with a reflective material. The reflectorized
material shall be of such nature as to provide effective and dependable
performance in the promotion of highway safety and vehicle
identification throughout the service period for which the license plates
are issued. The sum of $.50 shall be added to the cost of each
reflectorized license plate. The director shall change the color of such
license plates every time new license plates are issued under subsection
(b) of K.S.A. 8-132(b), and amendments thereto. The quantity of
license plates and registration decals to be furnished each county shall
be computed upon the basis of the number of motor vehicles registered
and reregistered in such county for the preceding year, and additional
license plates and decals shall be furnished as required.
(e) Any contract entered into pursuant to this section for the
manufacture of license plates and decals shall provide that the license
plates and decals, other than prorate license plates and prorate backing
plates, shall be shipped directly to the treasurer of the county where
they are to be used or, for digitally fulfilled license plate orders,
directly to the customer for whom the plate is issued. Any such contract
for the manufacture of state corporation commission identification tags
shall provide that such tags shall be shipped directly to the state
corporation commission.
Sec. 7. K.S.A. 8-1,146 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-
1,146. (a) Any owner or lessee of one or more passenger vehicles,
trucks of a gross weight of 20,000 pounds or less, motorcycles or travel
trailers, who is a resident of the state of Kansas, and submits
satisfactory proof to the director of vehicles as provided in subsection
(c) that such person has proof of: (1) Having Has served and is
designated as a veteran, and has had was discharged or released under
an honorable discharge or a general discharge under honorable
conditions from the United States army, navy, air force, marine corps,
coast guard, space force or merchant marines; or (2) is currently
serving in the United States army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast
guard, space force or merchant marines, upon compliance with the
provisions of this section, may be issued one distinctive license plate
for each such passenger vehicle, truck, motorcycle or travel trailer
designating such person as an United States military veteran. Such
license plate shall be issued for the same period of time as other license
plates upon proper registration and payment of the regular license fee

HOUSE BILL No. 2201—page 8
as provided in K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto.
(b) Any person issued a license plate under this section may
request a decal for each license plate indicating the appropriate military
branch in which the person served or is currently serving.
(c) Any person who is a veteran or current member of the United
States army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard, space force or
merchant marines may make application for such distinctive license
plate, not less than 60 days prior to such person's renewal of
registration date, on a form prescribed and furnished by the director of
vehicles. Any applicant for the distinctive license plate shall furnish the
director with proof as the director shall require that the applicant is a
veteran or current member of the United States army, navy, air force,
marine corps, coast guard, space force or merchant marines. As proof
of military veteran status, an applicant may shall provide a DD214
form, a DD form 2 (Retired) or a Kansas driver's license with a veteran
designation pursuant to K.S.A. 8-243(e), and amendments thereto, or a
copy of the veteran's DD form 214, NGB form 22 or an equivalent
discharge document as permitted by the director of vehicles showing
character of service as honorable or general under honorable
conditions. Application for the registration of a passenger vehicle,
truck, motorcycle or travel trailer and issuance of the license plates
under this section shall be made by the owner or lessee in a manner
prescribed by the director of vehicles upon forms furnished by the
director.
(d) No registration or distinctive license plates issued under the
authority of this section shall be transferable to any other person.
(e) Renewals of registration under this section shall be made
annually, upon payment of the fee prescribed in K.S.A. 8-143, and
amendments thereto, and in the manner prescribed in K.S.A. 8-132(b),
and amendments thereto. No renewal of registration shall be made to
any applicant until such applicant has filed with the director a form as
provided in subsection (c). If such form is not filed, the applicant shall
be required to comply with K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto, and
return the distinctive license plates to the county treasurer of such
person's residence.
(f) A fee of $2 shall be paid for each decal issued under subsection
(a). The director of vehicles shall design such decals. Such decals shall
be affixed to the license plate in the location required by the director.
Sec. 8. K.S.A. 8-1,194 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-
1,194. (a) On and after January 1, 2022, Any owner or lessee of one or
more passenger vehicles, trucks of a gross weight of 20,000 pounds or
less or motorcycles, who is a resident of Kansas, and who submits
satisfactory proof to the director of vehicles, in accordance with rules
and regulations adopted by the secretary of revenue as provided in
K.S.A. 8-1,146, and amendments thereto, that such person is currently
serving in the United States army or has separated was discharged or
released from the United States army and was honorably discharged
under an honorable discharge or general discharge under honorable
conditions, upon compliance with the provisions of this section, may be
issued one distinctive license plate for each such passenger vehicle,
truck or motorcycle designating such person as a current member or
veteran of the United States army. Such license plate shall be issued for
the same period of time as other license plates upon proper registration
and payment of the regular license fee as provided in K.S.A. 8-143, and
amendments thereto.
(b) Any person who is a current member or veteran of the United
States army may make application for such distinctive license plate, not
less than 60 days prior to such person's renewal of registration date, on
a form prescribed and furnished by the director of vehicles, and. Any
applicant for the distinctive license plate shall furnish the director with
proof as the director shall require that the applicant is a current member
or veteran of the United States army. Application for the registration of
a passenger vehicle, truck or motorcycle and issuance of the license
plate under this section shall be made by the owner or lessee in a

HOUSE BILL No. 2201—page 9
manner prescribed by the director of vehicles upon forms furnished by
the director.
(c) No registration or distinctive license plate issued under the
authority of this section shall be transferable to any other person.
(d) Renewals of registration under this section shall be made
annually, upon payment of the fee prescribed in subsection (a), in the
manner prescribed in K.S.A. 8-132(b), and amendments thereto. No
renewal of registration shall be made to any applicant until such
applicant has filed with the director a form as provided in subsection
(b). If such form is not filed, the applicant shall be required to comply
with K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto, and return the distinctive
license plate to the county treasurer of such person's residence.
(e) Upon satisfactory proof submitted to the director of vehicles,
in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the secretary of
revenue, any person issued a license plate under this section may
request that the license plate be printed to indicate that such person is a
retired member of the United States army.
Sec. 9. K.S.A. 8-1,195 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-
1,195. (a) On and after January 1, 2022, Any owner or lessee of one or
more passenger vehicles, trucks of a gross weight of 20,000 pounds or
less or motorcycles, who is a resident of Kansas, and who submits
satisfactory proof to the director of vehicles, in accordance with rules
and regulations adopted by the secretary of revenue as provided in
K.S.A. 8-1,146, and amendments thereto, that such person is currently
serving in the United States navy or has separated was discharged or
released from the United States navy and was honorably discharged
under an honorable discharge or a general discharge under honorable
conditions, upon compliance with the provisions of this section, may be
issued one distinctive license plate for each such passenger vehicle,
truck or motorcycle designating such person as a current member or
veteran of the United States navy. Such license plate shall be issued for
the same period of time as other license plates upon proper registration
and payment of the regular license fee as provided in K.S.A. 8-143, and
amendments thereto.
(b) Any person who is a current member or veteran of the United
States navy may make application for such distinctive license plate, not
less than 60 days prior to such person's renewal of registration date, on
a form prescribed and furnished by the director of vehicles, and. Any
applicant for the distinctive license plate shall furnish the director with
proof as the director shall require that the applicant is a current member
or veteran of the United States navy. Application for the registration of
a passenger vehicle, truck or motorcycle and issuance of the license
plate under this section shall be made by the owner or lessee in a
manner prescribed by the director of vehicles upon forms furnished by
the director.
(c) No registration or distinctive license plate issued under the
authority of this section shall be transferable to any other person.
(d) Renewals of registration under this section shall be made
annually, upon payment of the fee prescribed in subsection (a), in the
manner prescribed in K.S.A. 8-132(b), and amendments thereto. No
renewal of registration shall be made to any applicant until such
applicant has filed with the director a form as provided in subsection
(b). If such form is not filed, the applicant shall be required to comply
with K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto, and return the distinctive
license plate to the county treasurer of such person's residence.
(e) Upon satisfactory proof submitted to the director of vehicles,
in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the secretary of
revenue, any person issued a license plate under this section may
request that the license plate be printed to indicate that such person is a
retired member of the United States navy.
Sec. 10. K.S.A. 8-1,196 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-
1,196. (a) On and after January 1, 2022, Any owner or lessee of one or
more passenger vehicles, trucks of a gross weight of 20,000 pounds or
less or motorcycles, who is a resident of Kansas, and who submits

HOUSE BILL No. 2201—page 10
satisfactory proof to the director of vehicles, in accordance with rules
and regulations adopted by the secretary of revenue as provided in
K.S.A. 8-1,146, and amendments thereto, that such person is currently
serving in the United States marine corps or has separated was
discharged or released from the United States marine corps and was
honorably discharged under an honorable discharge or a general
discharge under honorable conditions, upon compliance with the
provisions of this section, may be issued one distinctive license plate
for each such passenger vehicle, truck or motorcycle designating such
person as a current member or veteran of the United States marine
corps. Such license plate shall be issued for the same period of time as
other license plates upon proper registration and payment of the regular
license fee as provided in K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto.
(b) Any person who is a current member or veteran of the United
States marine corps may make application for such distinctive license
plate, not less than 60 days prior to such person's renewal of
registration date, on a form prescribed and furnished by the director of
vehicles, and. Any applicant for the distinctive license plate shall
furnish the director with proof as the director shall require that the
applicant is a current member or veteran of the United States marine
corps. Application for the registration of a passenger vehicle, truck or
motorcycle and issuance of the license plate under this section shall be
made by the owner or lessee in a manner prescribed by the director of
vehicles upon forms furnished by the director.
(c) No registration or distinctive license plate issued under the
authority of this section shall be transferable to any other person.
(d) Renewals of registration under this section shall be made
annually, upon payment of the fee prescribed in subsection (a), in the
manner prescribed in K.S.A. 8-132(b), and amendments thereto. No
renewal of registration shall be made to any applicant until such
applicant has filed with the director a form as provided in subsection
(b). If such form is not filed, the applicant shall be required to comply
with K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto, and return the distinctive
license plate to the county treasurer of such person's residence.
(e) Upon satisfactory proof submitted to the director of vehicles,
in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the secretary of
revenue, any person issued a license plate under this section may
request that the license plate be printed to indicate that such person is a
retired member of the United States marine corps.
Sec. 11. K.S.A. 8-1,197 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-
1,197. (a) On and after January 1, 2022, Any owner or lessee of one or
more passenger vehicles, trucks of a gross weight of 20,000 pounds or
less or motorcycles, who is a resident of Kansas, and who submits
satisfactory proof to the director of vehicles, in accordance with rules
and regulations adopted by the secretary of revenue as provided in
K.S.A. 8-1,146, and amendments thereto, that such person is currently
serving in the United States air force or has separated was discharged
or released from the United States air force and was honorably
discharged under an honorable discharge or a general discharge under
honorable conditions, upon compliance with the provisions of this
section, may be issued one distinctive license plate for each such
passenger vehicle, truck or motorcycle designating such person as a
current member or veteran of the United States air force. Such license
plate shall be issued for the same period of time as other license plates
upon proper registration and payment of the regular license fee as
provided in K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto.
(b) Any person who is a current member or veteran of the United
States air force may make application for such distinctive license plate,
not less than 60 days prior to such person's renewal of registration date,
on a form prescribed and furnished by the director of vehicles, and.
Any applicant for the distinctive license plate shall furnish the director
with proof as the director shall require that the applicant is a current
member or veteran of the United States air force. Application for the
registration of a passenger vehicle, truck or motorcycle and issuance of

HOUSE BILL No. 2201—page 11
the license plate under this section shall be made by the owner or lessee
in a manner prescribed by the director of vehicles upon forms furnished
by the director.
(c) No registration or distinctive license plate issued under the
authority of this section shall be transferable to any other person.
(d) Renewals of registration under this section shall be made
annually, upon payment of the fee prescribed in subsection (a), in the
manner prescribed in K.S.A. 8-132(b), and amendments thereto. No
renewal of registration shall be made to any applicant until such
applicant has filed with the director a form as provided in subsection
(b). If such form is not filed, the applicant shall be required to comply
with K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto, and return the distinctive
license plate to the county treasurer of such person's residence.
(e) Upon satisfactory proof submitted to the director of vehicles,
in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the secretary of
revenue, any person issued a license plate under this section may
request that the license plate be printed to indicate that such person is a
retired member of the United States air force.
Sec. 12. K.S.A. 8-1,198 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-
1,198. (a) On and after January 1, 2022, Any owner or lessee of one or
more passenger vehicles, trucks of a gross weight of 20,000 pounds or
less or motorcycles, who is a resident of Kansas, and who submits
satisfactory proof to the director of vehicles, in accordance with rules
and regulations adopted by the secretary of revenue as provided in
K.S.A. 8-1,146, and amendments thereto, that such person is currently
serving in the United States coast guard or has separated was
discharged or released from the United States coast guard and was
honorably discharged under an honorable discharge or a general
discharge under honorable conditions, upon compliance with the
provisions of this section, may be issued one distinctive license plate
for each such passenger vehicle, truck or motorcycle designating such
person as a current member or veteran of the United States coast guard.
Such license plate shall be issued for the same period of time as other
license plates upon proper registration and payment of the regular
license fee as provided in K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto.
(b) Any person who is a current member or veteran of the United
States coast guard may make application for such distinctive license
plate, not less than 60 days prior to such person's renewal of
registration date, on a form prescribed and furnished by the director of
vehicles, and. Any applicant for the distinctive license plate shall
furnish the director with proof as the director shall require that the
applicant is a current member or veteran of the United States coast
guard. Application for the registration of a passenger vehicle, truck or
motorcycle and issuance of the license plate under this section shall be
made by the owner or lessee in a manner prescribed by the director of
vehicles upon forms furnished by the director.
(c) No registration or distinctive license plate issued under the
authority of this section shall be transferable to any other person.
(d) Renewals of registration under this section shall be made
annually, upon payment of the fee prescribed in subsection (a), in the
manner prescribed in K.S.A. 8-132(b), and amendments thereto. No
renewal of registration shall be made to any applicant until such
applicant has filed with the director a form as provided in subsection
(b). If such form is not filed, the applicant shall be required to comply
with K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto, and return the distinctive
license plate to the county treasurer of such person's residence.
(e) Upon satisfactory proof submitted to the director of vehicles,
in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the secretary of
revenue, any person issued a license plate under this section may
request that the license plate be printed to indicate that such person is a
retired member of the United States coast guard.
Sec. 13. K.S.A. 8-1,199 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-
1,199. (a) On and after January 1, 2022, Any owner or lessee of one or
more passenger vehicles, trucks of a gross weight of 20,000 pounds or

HOUSE BILL No. 2201—page 12
less or motorcycles, who is a resident of Kansas, and who submits
satisfactory proof to the director of vehicles, in accordance with rules
and regulations adopted by the secretary of revenue as provided in
K.S.A. 8-1,146, and amendments thereto, that such person is currently
serving in the United States space force or has separated was
discharged or released from the United States space force and was
honorably discharged under an honorable discharge or a general
discharge under honorable conditions, upon compliance with the
provisions of this section, may be issued one distinctive license plate
for each such passenger vehicle, truck or motorcycle designating such
person as a current member or veteran of the United States space force.
Such license plate shall be issued for the same period of time as other
license plates upon proper registration and payment of the regular
license fee as provided in K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto.
(b) Any person who is a current member or veteran of the United
States space force may make application for such distinctive license
plate, not less than 60 days prior to such person's renewal of
registration date, on a form prescribed and furnished by the director of
vehicles, and. Any applicant for the distinctive license plate shall
furnish the director with proof as the director shall require that the
applicant is a current member or veteran of the United States space
force. Application for the registration of a passenger vehicle, truck or
motorcycle and issuance of the license plate under this section shall be
made by the owner or lessee in a manner prescribed by the director of
vehicles upon forms furnished by the director.
(c) No registration or distinctive license plate issued under the
authority of this section shall be transferable to any other person.
(d) Renewals of registration under this section shall be made
annually, upon payment of the fee prescribed in subsection (a), in the
manner prescribed in K.S.A. 8-132(b), and amendments thereto. No
renewal of registration shall be made to any applicant until such
applicant has filed with the director a form as provided in subsection
(b). If such form is not filed, the applicant shall be required to comply
with K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto, and return the distinctive
license plate to the county treasurer of such person's residence.
(e) Upon satisfactory proof submitted to the director of vehicles,
in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the secretary of
revenue, any person issued a license plate under this section may
request that the license plate be printed to indicate that such person is a
retired member of the United States space force.

HOUSE BILL No. 2201—page 13
Sec. 14. K.S.A. 8-132, 8-147, 8-1,146, 8-1,194, 8-1,195, 8-1,196,
8-1,197, 8-1,198 and 8-1,199 and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 8-134 are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 15. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the HOUSE, and was
adopted by that body
HOUSE adopted
Conference Committee Report
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
SENATE adopted
Conference Committee Report
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
Governor.